Mississippi statutes. Title 81. Banks and Financial Institutions
General Provisions

§ 81-5-1.
General regulations.

All banking corporations are prohibited, either through their officers or as a banking agency, from participating, directly or indirectly, in the operation of any underwriting syndicate which handles securities for resale. However, this inhibition shall not apply to bonds issued by federal, state, county or other governmental agencies.

The executive officers of banking corporations now existing or hereafter organized under the laws of the State of Mississippi are prohibited from owning stock in private banking houses or other agencies engaged in the business of underwriting securities for resale.

The Commissioner of Banking and Consumer Finance is authorized, empowered and directed to promulgate rules and regulations, relative to withdrawals of deposits from savings banks, trust companies and other banking institutions, and the commissioner may, in cases of emergency, declare bank holidays and do any and all things necessary to insure, protect and conserve the resources of such banks.

All state banking corporations are prohibited from making loans to state, county, municipal and district governmental agencies, unless such loans are made in strict compliance with legal enactments and regulations which govern, and such banking corporations are further prohibited from transferring funds from one state, county, municipal or district account to another unless authorized by warrant issued by proper authority, and such banking corporations are prohibited from discounting state, county, municipal, district or other public certificates and warrants, but such certificates and warrants may be used as collateral to guarantee the payment of notes or other obligations.

The board of directors of any banking corporation created under the laws of this state may, at its option, require any or all employees of such to file with the board of directors a sworn financial statement semiannually or more often if it so desires.

Any bank may, at its option, pay all checks drawn on it with currency or valid exchange drawn on a bank in a reserve city not more than five hundred (500) miles distant from such bank; but each depositor is entitled to have his checks paid each day in currency to the total extent of ten percent (10%) of his deposit if it exceeds One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) and at least One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) each day if his balance is over One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) and less than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), and may demand his entire balance in currency at any time if One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) or less.

All state banking corporations may purchase for the account of their customers bonds, stocks and other securities, and such banking corporations may charge for their service in connection with the handling of such transactions only actual expenses plus the usual broker’s fees allowed for similar service by national banks.

Any state bank may purchase, lease or otherwise acquire automatic data processing computers and related machinery and equipment, and such bank may utilize and operate such computers, machinery and equipment in performing for itself, its customers or any other bank such services as may be desired, including, but not limited to, check and deposit sorting and posting, computation and posting of interest and other credits and charges, preparation and mailing of checks, statements, notices and similar items, or any other clerical, bookkeeping, accounting, statistical or similar functions performed by and for a bank. Corporations may be organized under the laws of the State of Mississippi for the purpose of owning and operating, by purchase, lease or otherwise, such computers, related machinery and equipment as aforesaid, and such corporations may perform for any bank those services as above mentioned; and stock of such corporations shall be legal investments for state banks to the same extent that stock of bank service corporations is eligible for acquisition by national banks under the provisions of the Bank Service Corporation Act, Public Law 87-856, 76 Stat. 1132.

In addition to other powers, a state-chartered bank shall have and possess such of the rights, powers, privileges, immunities, duties and obligations of a national bank having its principal place of business in this state as may be prescribed by the State Board of Banking Review by general regulation under the circumstances and conditions set out therein. In the event of a conflict between the provisions of this subsection (9) and the provisions of any other act or acts, directly or indirectly, governing or regulating the activities of state-chartered banks, the provisions of this subsection (9) shall control, and insurance activities of all banks, their subsidiaries, affiliates, branches, officers and employees doing business in this state shall be governed by the provisions of Title 83, Mississippi Code of 1972, only to the extent that Title 83, Mississippi Code of 1972, applies to national banks in Mississippi.

The purpose of this subsection (10) is to provide for parity among Mississippi chartered or domiciled banks extending open-end credit in this state, as well as to promote the retention of existing financial services within the state by encouraging Mississippi chartered or domiciled banks to continue their open-end credit operations in this state, rather than relocating those operations to other states with interest rates, fees and credit terms that may not be available under Mississippi law and exporting such interest rates, fees and credit terms back to Mississippi under the most favored lender doctrine of federal law.

For the purpose of this subsection, “open-end credit account” means an arrangement between a creditor and a customer in which:

The creditor permits the customer to obtain credit advances on a pre-authorized basis;

The creditor reasonably contemplates repeated transactions;

The creditor assesses interest on the outstanding unpaid balance of the customer’s account; or

The amount of credit that may be extended to the customer, up to any limit set by the creditor, is made available to the extent that any unpaid balance is repaid.

A Mississippi chartered or domiciled bank that seeks to use the provisions of this subsection shall set forth in the records of the bank the rates and fees to be charged, the state where the rates and fees are permissible and the identity of one or more of the financial institutions.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, Mississippi chartered or domiciled banks offering open-end credit may assess finance charges, credit service charges and fees and charges that are material to the determination of the interest rate in connection with open-end accounts at rates and amounts that are equal to or are less than the amounts that financial institutions domiciled in other states are permitted to impose and collect when extending credit to Mississippi customers as a result of the most favored lender doctrine of federal law.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, for purposes of this subsection and Title 12, Sections 85, 1831d and 1730g of the United States Code, as applicable to the exportation of interest rates and any fees and charges that are material to their determination, any interest rates, finance charges, credit service charges and other fees and charges, in amount, as well as manner and method of computation, imposed by Mississippi chartered or domiciled banks under this subsection shall be authorized by Mississippi law.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any interest, finance charges, credit service charges or other fees or charges that are adopted from another state by a Mississippi chartered or domiciled bank, including those that are otherwise permissible in an amount under Mississippi law, may be assessed, accrued, earned or changed in the same manner or method as permitted under the law of the state from which they have been adopted, regardless of whether such manner or method is material to the determination of the interest rate under the law of that state.

For purposes of this subsection, Mississippi chartered or domiciled banks may impose interest, finance charges, credit service charges or other fees and charges from one or more open-end credit accounts offered by financial institutions in other states in connection with a single open-end credit account.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5224; Laws, 1934, ch. 146; Laws, 1936, ch. 165; Laws, 1954, ch. 164; Laws, 1966, ch. 252, § 1; Laws, 1982, ch. 486; Laws, 1983, ch. 342, § 1; Laws, 1988, ch. 543, § 2; Laws, 1988, ch. 576; Laws, 1991, ch. 345, § 1; Laws, 1995, ch. 307, § 1; Laws, 1997, ch. 305, § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 412, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2006; Laws, 2018, ch. 354, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2018; Laws, 2019, ch. 431, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 29, 2019).

§ 81-5-2.
Private corporation laws; application to state banks.

All the provisions of law relating to private corporations operating in this state which are not inconsistent with this chapter or Chapters 1 and 3 of Title 81, Mississippi Code of 1972, or with the proper business of depository institutions, shall be applicable to all state banks.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 392, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 17, 1998).

§ 81-5-3.
Bank not to permit use of its name.

It shall be unlawful for any bank or corporation liable to taxation on its capital stock to permit any person to use its name in taking promissory notes, mortgages or deeds or trust, or to permit such instruments to indicate on their face that they are payable to such bank or corporation when the money to secure which such instruments are taken is not actually advanced or is not intended to be advanced by such bank or corporation, and it shall be unlawful for any person to use the name of such bank or corporation in making loans of money. Any such bank or corporation or individual violating the provisions of this section shall be liable to a penalty of twenty-five per cent of the amount of such loan, to be recovered by the state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5190; Laws, 1934, ch. 146.

§ 81-5-5.
Local and regional banks for farm loans authorized.

Local and regional banks for the purpose of making and floating loans upon farms in the State of Mississippi may be established under any legislation enacted or to be enacted by Congress and in such manner as may be provided by Congress and any bonds representing loans on farms and bearing a rate of interest of six per cent or less per annum, shall be exempt from all state and other taxation.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5278; Laws, 1934, ch. 146.

§ 81-5-7.
Preservation of old records.

Each bank shall retain permanently the minute books of meetings of its stockholders and directors, its capital stock ledger and capital stock certificate ledger or stubs, its general ledger, its daily statements of condition, its general journal, its investment ledger, its copies of bank examination reports, and all ledger sheets showing unpaid balances in favor of depositors.

The Commissioner of Banking and Consumer Finance shall from time to time prescribe by order and so notify each bank, a classified list of such other records which shall be preserved and the length of time therefor.

Actions at law and administrative proceedings in which the production of bank records might be necessary or desirable.

State and federal statutes of limitation applicable to such actions or proceedings.

The availability of information contained in bank records from other sources.

Such other matters as the commissioner shall deem pertinent in order that his regulations will require banks to retain their records for as short a period as is commensurate with the interests of bank customers and shareholders and of the people of this state in having bank records available.

Prior to issuing any such regulation, the commissioner shall consider:

Any state bank may dispose of any record which has been retained for the period prescribed by or in accordance with the terms of this section for retention of records of its class, and shall thereafter be under no duty to produce such record in any action or proceeding.

Any state bank may cause any or all records at any time in its custody to be reproduced in a format of storage commonly used, whether electronic, imaged, magnetic, microphotographic, or otherwise, and any reproduction so made shall have the same force and effect as the original thereof and be admitted in evidence equally with the original.

To the extent that they are not in contravention of any law of the United States, the provisions of this section shall apply to all banks doing business in this state.

No liability shall accrue against any bank destroying any records held for the period of time as provided in subsection (1) of this section, and in any cause or proceeding in which any such records or files may be called in question or be demanded of the bank or any officer or employee thereof, a showing that such records or files have been destroyed in accordance with the terms of this section shall be sufficient reason for the failure to produce them.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5278-01; Laws, 1944, ch. 258, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1952, ch. 184, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 2000, ch. 335, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 16, 2000.).

§ 81-5-9.
Banks shall become members of the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation.

All banking corporations organized under the laws of the State of Mississippi shall become members of Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or any other similar agency created by the laws of the United States to insure or guarantee deposits in banks. Such banks are empowered to enter into such contracts, incur such obligations and generally to do and perform all such acts and things as may be necessary or appropriate in order to take advantage of all memberships, grants, rights, or privileges which may at any time be available to banking institutions or their depositors, creditors, or stockholders by virtue of the act of Congress, and amendments thereto, providing for the establishment of Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation and the insurance of deposits in banks, or any other act, resolution or amendment passed by Congress to aid, regulate or safeguard banking institutions and their depositors, including any substitutions therefor; and banks are authorized to subscribe for and acquire any stock, debentures, bonds or other types of securities of the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5191; Laws, 1934, ch. 146; Laws, 1936, ch. 165; Laws, 1994, ch. 320, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 81-5-11.
State banks may become members of Federal Reserve Bank.

Any bank or trust company incorporated under the laws of Mississippi shall have power to subscribe to the capital stock and become a member of a Federal Reserve bank created and organized under the act of congress of the United States approved December 23, 1913, and known as the Federal Reserve Act and its amendments.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5283; Laws, 1934, ch. 146.

§ 81-5-13.
Federal Reserve Act requirements must be observed.

Any bank or trust company, incorporated under the laws of Mississippi, which shall become a member of a Federal Reserve bank, shall comply with the reserve requirements of the Federal Reserve Act and its amendments, and the compliance of such bank or trust company therewith shall be in lieu of, and shall relieve such bank or trust company from, compliance with the provisions of the laws of this state relating to the maintenance of reserves.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5284; Laws, 1934, ch. 146.

§ 81-5-15.
Officers and employees of banks to furnish fidelity bond; insurance.

Every active officer and employee of any bank or trust company in this state shall furnish a fidelity bond to the bank by which he is employed for the faithful performance of his duties, executed by some surety company authorized to do business in the State of Mississippi, as surety. The conditions of such bond, whether the instrument so describes the conditions or not, shall be that the principal shall protect the obligee against any loss or liability that the obligee may suffer or incur by reason of the acts of dishonesty of the principal or by reason of the violation of any of the provisions of the banking laws of Mississippi. The amount of such bond shall be fixed by the board of directors, subject, however, to approval of the state comptroller and the same shall be inspected upon the examination of the bank or trust company.

Every banking corporation shall provide adequate insurance protection and indemnity against robbery and burglary and other similar insurable losses. Whenever any bank refuses or fails to comply with this requirement the state comptroller may contract for such protection and indemnity and add the cost thereof to the assessment otherwise payable by such bank for the support of the department of bank supervision.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5192; Laws, 1934, ch. 146; Laws, 1936, ch. 165.

§ 81-5-17.
Bank stock; transfer and use as collateral.

The shares of stock of banks shall be deemed personal property, and shall be transferred on the books of the bank in such manner as the by-laws thereof shall direct, and as required by law. But no bank shall accept as collateral, or be the purchaser of, its own stock, except in cases where the taking of such collateral, or such purchase, shall be necessary to prevent loss upon a debt previously contracted in good faith, and in such cases, unless full payment of such debt is made, such stock shall be sold by the bank within twelve months from the date it was acquired.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5193; Laws, 1934, ch. 146.

§ 81-5-19.
Stock; record of transfer of to be kept.

A book shall be provided and kept by every bank, in which shall be entered the names and residences of the stockholders thereof, the number of shares held by each, the time when such person became a stockholder, and also all transfers of stock, stating the time when made, the number of shares and by whom transferred. In all actions, suits and proceedings, such book shall be prima facie evidence of the facts therein stated.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5194; Laws, 1934, ch. 146.

§ 81-5-21.
Stock of other banks not to be owned.

No part of the stock of any bank except regional reserve banks shall be owned by a state bank. In cases where such stock is taken as collateral and the purchase thereof shall be necessary to prevent loss upon a debt previously contracted in good faith, then in such cases such stock shall be sold by the bank within twelve months from the time it was acquired, unless the consent of the state comptroller is obtained in writing extending such period. A violation of this section by any bank shall subject it to liquidation and forfeiture of charter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5195; Laws, 1934, ch. 146; Laws, 1936, ch. 165.

§ 81-5-23.
Preferred stock; issuance authorized.

Banks may, with the approval of the state comptroller, and by a vote of stockholders owning a majority of the stock of such bank, upon not less than five (5) days’ notice, given by registered mail, pursuant to action taken by their boards of directors, issue preferred stock of one or more classes in such amount and with such par value as shall be approved by the said comptroller, and may make such amendments to their charters as may be necessary for this purpose; but, in the case of a newly organized bank which has not yet issued common stock, the requirement of notice to and vote of stockholders shall not apply.

The holders of such preferred stock shall be entitled to receive such cumulative dividends at a stipulated rate and shall have such voting and conversion rights and such control of management, and such stock shall be subject to retirement in such manner and upon such conditions as may be provided in the charter, with the approval of the state comptroller. The holders of such preferred stock shall not be held individually responsible as such holders for any debts, contracts or engagements of such bank, and shall not be liable for assessments to restore impairments in the capital of such bank as provided by law with reference to the holders of common stock.

Preferred stock issued by any bank in this state shall be exempt from all state, county, municipal, levee district, and other ad valorem taxes so long as the same shall be held by an agency of the federal government.

The acts of any board of directors of any banking corporation organized and operating under the laws of the State of Mississippi, insofar as such acts pertain to the issuance of preferred stock which may have heretofore been issued, are hereby in all particulars validated.

No dividend shall be declared or paid on common stock until the cumulated dividends on the preferred stock shall have been paid in full; and, if the corporation is placed in either voluntary or involuntary liquidation, no payment shall be made to the holders of the common stock until the owners of the preferred stock shall have been paid in full the par value of such preferred stock plus all accumulated dividends.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5215; Laws, 1934, ch. 146; Laws, 1966, ch. 251, § 1; Laws, 1980, ch. 414, eff from and after July 1, 1980.

§ 81-5-25.
Investments in stock of small business investment companies.

Shares of stock issued by small business investment companies, incorporated in this state and licensed under the provisions of the Small Business Investment Act of 1958, Public Law 699, 85th Congress, and any amendments thereto, shall be legal investments for state chartered banks and trust companies, to the same extent that shares of small business investment companies are eligible for purchase by national banks under the provisions of said Small Business Investment Act of 1958, and any amendments thereto.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5224.7; Laws, 1962, ch. 178, eff from and after passage (approved May 22, 1962).

§ 81-5-27.
Liability of stockholders.

The stockholders of every bank shall be individually liable, actually and ratably, and not for one another, for the benefit of the depositors in said bank at the amount of their stock at the par value thereof, and in addition to said stock. However, persons holding stock as executors, administrators, guardians or trustees shall not be personally liable as stockholders, but the assets and funds in their hands constituting the trust shall be liable to the same extent as the testator, intestate, ward, or person interested in such trust fund would be, if living or competent to act. Persons holding stock as collateral security shall not be personally liable as stockholders, but the person pledging such stock shall be deemed the stockholder and liable under this section. Such double liability may be enforced in a suit at law or in equity by the receiver of any bank in process of liquidation. Such suit, however, shall be brought within six years from the date the bank went into liquidation and not thereafter. Such double liability shall not apply, however, to stock in any bank organized, after April 2, 1934, nor to stock in any bank open for business on April 2, 1934, provided such bank is a member of the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, or any other similar agency created by the laws of the United States.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5280; Laws, 1934, ch. 146; Laws, 1936, ch. 166.

§ 81-5-28.
Bank holding companies; definitions; control of banks.

As used in this section, unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

“Bank” means any company that accepts deposits in Mississippi that are insured under the provisions of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act, 12 U.S.C. 1811 et seq., as amended; provided, however, that the term “bank” shall not include a company engaged solely in the trust business, all or substantially all of the deposits of which are in trust funds and are received in a bona fide fiduciary capacity.

“Bank holding company” means any company which is a bank holding company under the provisions of the Federal Bank Holding Company Act of 1956, 12 U.S.C. 1841 et seq., as amended.

“Company” has the meaning assigned in Section 2(b) of the Federal Bank Holding Company Act of 1956, 12 U.S.C. 1841(b), as amended.

“Control” has the meaning assigned in Sections 2(a)(2) and (3) of the Federal Bank Holding Company Act of 1956, 12 U.S.C. 1841(a)(2) and (3), as amended, except that the reference therein to “the board” shall be deemed to refer to the Mississippi Commissioner of Banking and Consumer Finance.

No bank holding company shall control a bank unless the bank is a bank as defined in Section 2(c) of the Federal Bank Holding Company Act of 1956, 12 U.S.C. 1841(c), as amended.

No company that is not a bank holding company shall control a bank.

The Mississippi Commissioner of Banking and Consumer Finance shall have the power to enforce the prohibitions of this section by seeking to enjoin any violation, by issuing cease and desist orders, by imposing administrative fines or penalties, and by any other remedies that are provided by law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 329, eff from and after passage (approved March 15, 1985).

§ 81-5-29.
Corporations may be formed to purchase, hold and own bank assets.

Corporations may be formed to purchase, hold and own bank assets. By and with the consent and approval of the Commissioner of Banking and Consumer Finance, corporations may be formed in this state for the purpose of purchasing, holding, owning, dealing in, lending on and borrowing on assets of banks, either open or in liquidation. From and after July 1, 2014, any proposed transfer of bank assets to be purchased, held or owned by a corporation authorized by this section shall be subject to the prior consent and approval of the commissioner. By and with the consent and approval of the commissioner, banks and receivers of banks may purchase any stock issued by such corporations, which shall have all the general corporate powers of corporations created under the general corporation laws of this state. By and with the consent and approval of the commissioner, banks may purchase and deal in any obligations of indebtedness issued by such corporations. In addition to general power to issue stock and borrow money, such corporation shall have specific power to issue stocks, common or preferred, to all agencies of the federal government, and to borrow money from and pledge assets to all such agencies. The commissioner shall have general supervision of the organization, operation and business of such corporation, and may issue and enforce regulations with reference thereto. The name of all such corporations shall include the words “bank securities corporation.”

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5196; Laws, 1934, ch. 146; Laws, 1966, ch. 247, § 1; Laws, 2014, ch. 359, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 81-5-31.
Voting trusts prohibited.

The transfer of any part of the stock of a state bank to trustees solely or primarily that they may vote the same at annual elections and stockholders’ meetings – “voting trusts” as they are generally known – is expressly prohibited. A violation of this section by any bank or banks shall constitute a breach of law, and subject any such bank or banks to liquidation and forfeiture of their respective charters; provided, however, that this section shall not apply to any stock owned by an agency of the federal government.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5197; Laws, 1934, ch. 146; Laws, 1966, ch. 248, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 11, 1966).

§ 81-5-33.
Powers in regard to trusts.

Banks may accept and execute all such trusts and perform such duties of every description as may be committed to them by any person or corporation or that may be committed or transferred to them by order of any court of record. They may receive money in trust, take and accept by grant, assignment, transfer, devise or bequest, and hold any real or personal estate or trusts created according to the laws of this or any other state or of the United States, and execute those legal trusts in regard to the same, on such terms as may be directed or agreed upon. They may act as agent for the investment of money or the management of property for other persons, and as agent for persons and corporations for the purpose of issuing, registering, transferring or countersigning the certificates of stock, bonds or other evidences of debt of any corporation, association, municipality, state, county or public authority on such terms as may be agreed upon. They also may act as guardian for any minor or person with mental illness under the appointment of any court of record having jurisdiction of the person or estate of the minor or person with mental illness and may act as administrator or executor of the estate of any deceased person. They may act as agent or attorney in fact and as commissioner for the sale of property, both real and personal, and may act as assignee or receiver, or as trustee in mortgages or bond issues, or in any other fiduciary capacity authorized by law. They may accept trust funds or other property upon specially agreed terms and pay or deliver the same to the owners, beneficiaries or others, as the case may be, when and as the same should be paid or delivered according to the terms of the trust agreement under which it is held. Whenever under the laws of this or any other state or under the rule or order of any court, the execution of a bond for the protection of a private or court trust is required, a trust company shall be authorized to execute the bond for the protection of any trust or trust estate being administered by it.

Banking corporations created, organized and doing business under the laws of the State of Mississippi may exercise, without amendment of their charters, and under their charter authority to engage in the general business of banking, all or any of the foregoing powers. However, before any bank whose charter merely authorizes the exercise of general banking functions may exercise those powers, the previous written consent of the Commissioner of Banking and Consumer Finance shall be obtained.

Banks exercising any or all of those powers shall segregate all assets held in any fiduciary capacity from the general assets of the bank and shall keep a separate set of books and records showing in proper detail all transactions engaged in under the authority of this section or under the authority granted to them in their charter or otherwise. Those books and records shall be inspected and examined by the state bank examiners at each and every examination of the bank.

No bank shall receive in its trust department deposits of current funds subject to check or the deposit of checks, drafts, bills of exchange or other items for collection or exchange purposes. Funds deposited or held in trust by the bank awaiting investment or distribution shall be carried in a separate account and shall not be used by the bank in the conduct of its business, unless it first sets aside in the trust department United States bonds or bonds of the State of Mississippi or any subdivision of the state, the market value of which shall at all times be not less than ten percent (10%) in excess of the total funds so held, exclusive of the portion of funds insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation.

In the event of the failure or liquidation of the bank, the owners of the funds held in trust for investment or distribution shall have a prior lien on the bonds or other securities so set apart in addition to their claim against the assets of the bank.

In any case in which the laws of this state require that one acting as trustee, executor, administrator or in any fiduciary capacity must take an oath or make an affidavit, the president, vice president, cashier or trust officer of a bank may take the necessary oath or execute the necessary affidavit.

In making investments of trust funds, it shall be unlawful for any bank to purchase securities from itself or to purchase securities in which it may be interested, directly or indirectly. However, any bank, including a national bank, authorized to do business in this state in a fiduciary capacity may, unless prohibited or otherwise limited by the instrument governing the fiduciary relationship, in the exercise of its investment discretion or at the direction of another person authorized to direct the investment of funds held by the bank as fiduciary, invest and reinvest in the securities of, or other interests in, any open-end or closed-end management type investment company or investment trust registered under the Investment Company Act of 1940, 15 USCS Section 80a-1, et seq., as amended, notwithstanding that the banking institution or affiliate of the banking institution provides services to the investment company or investment trust, such as that of an investment advisor, custodian, transfer agent, registrar, sponsor, distributor, manager or otherwise, and receives reasonable remuneration for those services, so long as the total compensation paid by the trust or custodial estate as trustee’s fees and mutual fund fees is reasonable, taking into account the nature and extent of the trustee’s duties, the nature and extent of the services provided to the investment company or investment trust, and the total compensation, costs and fees that would otherwise be paid, directly or indirectly, by the trust or custodial estate if the investment were made in an investment company or investment trust for which the bank or its affiliates provided no services. With respect to any funds so invested, the banking institution shall make available by statement, prospectus or otherwise to all current income beneficiaries of an account the basis, expressed as a percentage of asset value or otherwise, upon which the remuneration is calculated. No bank shall lend to any officer, director or employee of the bank any funds held in trust by it, and any officer, director or employee making a loan, or to whom such a loan is made, shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, may be fined not more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) or imprisoned in the State Penitentiary for not more than five (5) years, or by both that fine and imprisonment, in the discretion of the court.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5198; Laws, 1934, ch. 146; Laws, 1936, ch. 165; Laws, 1992, ch. 347, § 1; Laws, 2008, ch. 442, § 21, eff from and after July 1, 2008.

§ 81-5-34.
Accounts of administrators, executors, guardians, trustees, and other fiduciaries.

Any bank, including a national bank, may accept accounts in the name of any administrator, executor, guardian, trustee or other fiduciary in trust for a named beneficiary or beneficiaries including the authority to exercise all rights and powers granted to a fiduciary under the Revised Uniform Fiduciary Access to Digital Assets Act created under Chapter 23, Title 91. Any such fiduciary shall have the power to make payments upon and to withdraw any such account, in whole or in part. The withdrawal value of any such account or other rights relating thereto may be paid or delivered, in whole or in part, to such fiduciary, without regard to any notice to the contrary, as long as such fiduciary is living. The payment or delivery to any such fiduciary or a receipt of acquittance signed by any such fiduciary to whom any such payment or any such delivery of rights is made shall be valid and sufficient release and discharge of any bank for the payment or delivery so made. Whenever a person holding an account in a fiduciary capacity dies, and no written notice of the revocation or termination of the trust relationship has been given to a bank and the bank has no notice of any other disposition of the trust estate, the withdrawal value of such account or other rights relating thereto may, at the option of a bank, be paid or delivered, in whole or in part, to the beneficiary or beneficiaries of such trust. Whenever an account shall be opened by any person describing himself in opening such account as trustee for another, and there is no other or further notice of the existence and terms of a legal and valid trust, then such description shall be given in writing to such bank. In the event of the death of the person so described as trustee, the withdrawal value of such account or any part thereof may be paid to the person for whom the account was thus stated to have been opened, and such account and all additions thereto shall be the property of such person, unless prior to payment the trust agreement is presented to the bank showing a contrary interest. When made in accord with this section, the payment or delivery to any such beneficiary, beneficiaries or designated person, or a receipt or acquittance signed by any such beneficiary, beneficiaries or designated person for any such payment or delivery, shall be valid and sufficient release and discharge of a bank for the payment or delivery so made. Trust accounts permitted by this section shall not be required to be acknowledged and recorded. When an account is opened in a form described in this section, the right set forth in Section 81-5-62 shall apply. No bank paying any beneficiary in accordance with the provisions of this section shall thereby be liable for any estate, inheritance or succession taxes which may be due this state. The term “accounts” or “account” as used in this section shall include, but not be limited to, any form of deposit or account, such as a savings account, checking account, time deposit, demand deposit or certificate of deposit, whether negotiable, nonnegotiable or otherwise.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1984, ch. 326, § 1; Laws, 1988, ch. 484, § 1; Laws, 2017, ch. 419, § 20, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 81-5-35.
State and national banks acting in fiduciary capacity not required to file bond; exception.

No state or national bank domiciled in this state and duly authorized by law to act in a fiduciary capacity shall be required to make or file any bond or other security for the faithful performance of its duty when acting as executor, administrator, guardian, conservator, trustee, or in any other fiduciary capacity, unless the instrument creating any such trust or the court having jurisdiction thereof shall specifically direct that such bond or other security shall be given for the performance of such trust and shall fix the amount thereof. The chancery court or chancellor in vacation, having jurisdiction over any such estate or trust existing at the time of the enactment of this statute may, in its discretion, cancel any such bond or release any such security and discharge the surety or sureties thereon. However, the retroactive effect of this section shall not apply to the release of any such bond or security or surety on any estate, guardianship, or trust on which a bond or security or surety was required as a result of the failure of a probated will to waive bond, security, or surety.

HISTORY:
Codes 1942, § 5198.3; Laws, 1968, ch. 252, eff from and after passage (approved June 24, 1968).